Massachusetts, session 194th, H463.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 295C of Chapter 94, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the first paragraph the following paragraph:-
A retailer dealer of motor fuel shall also publicly display and maintain on each pump or
other dispensing device from which motor fuel is sold, at least 1 warning sign, clearly visible,
stating “Warning! Every gallon of gasoline that is combusted dumps 19 pounds of carbon
dioxide into the atmosphere, which causes global heating.”
SECTION 2. Section 295C of said Chapter 94 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:-
No sign, advertising material or other display or product that is placed upon, above or
around a pump or dispenser shall directly or indirectly obscure the posted price sign or warning
sign as required by the two preceding paragraphs.
of 1